Florida, session 2026, HB611.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
88
89 Section 1. Section 373.1861, Florida Statutes, is created
90 to read:
91 373.1861 Short title.—Sections 373.1861-373.1869 may be
92 cited as the "Landscape Irrigation Standards and Watering
93 Restrictions Act."
94 Section 2. Section 373.1862, Florida Statutes, is created
95 to read:
96 373.1862 LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND PURPOSE; APPLICABILITY.—
97 (1) While an automatic landscape irrigation system is not
98 required, and a carefully designed landscape or a temporary
99 irrigation system may be considered for any property, it is the
100 intent and purpose of this act to:
Page 4 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
101 (a) Implement procedures that promote water conservation
102 through more efficient use of landscape irrigation to improve
103 environmental quality; and
104 (b) Ensure efficient water use by establishing minimum
105 standards for landscape irrigation design which are considerate
106 of the climate, soil health, water resources, land use, and
107 resource planning of watershed districts in this state.
108 (2) Water use in landscape irrigation systems may be
109 reduced by providing for all of the following:
110 (a) The preservation of existing vegetation.
111 (b) The use of site-appropriate plant materials.
112 (c) The use of pervious paving materials.
113 (d) The use of water-efficient landscape irrigation.
114 (e) The use of applicable best management practices.
115 (f) The use of environmentally sensitive site development
116 concepts.
117 (3) This act applies to new commercial landscapes,
118 residential landscapes, institutional developments proposing to
119 install a landscape irrigation system, and any substantial
120 improvement or modification to an existing landscape irrigation
121 system which requires 50 percent or more of the irrigation
122 system to be replaced or altered.
123 (4) This act does not apply to irrigation systems for any
124 of the following:
125 (a) Agricultural production systems.
Page 5 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
126 (b) Greenhouses.
127 (c) Nurseries.
128 (d) Cemeteries.
129 (e) Golf courses.
130 (f) Athletic fields, playgrounds, or intensive
131 recreational areas.
132 (g) Vegetable gardens, fruit tree groves, or nut tree
133 groves.
134 Section 3. Section 373.1863, Florida Statutes, is created
135 to read:
136 373.1863 DEFINITIONS.—As used in this act, the term:
137 (1) "Address" means the house number of a physical
138 location of a specific property. This includes rural route
139 numbers but excludes post office box numbers. If a lot number in
140 a mobile home park or similar community is used by the United
141 States Postal Service to determine a delivery location, the lot
142 number is the property's address. An even-numbered address means
143 an address ending in the numbers 0, 2, 4, 6, or 8 or the letters
144 A-M. An odd-numbered address means an address ending in the
145 numbers 1, 3, 5, 7, or 9 or the letters N-Z.
146 (2) "Application rate" or "precipitation rate" means the
147 rate at which water is applied to a given area by sprinklers or
148 emitters, usually expressed as depth per unit of time.
149 (3) "Automatic irrigation controller" means a device that
150 automatically turns an irrigation system, such as a lawn
Page 6 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
151 sprinkler or drip irrigation system, on and off and is also
152 known as a clock or timer.
153 (4) "Bubbler" means an emission device that applies water
154 to the soil, discharging at least 0.5 to 2 gallons of water per
155 hour, but generally less than 60 gallons per hour.
156 (5) "Bubbler irrigation" means the application of water to
157 the soil surface at the plant root zone, discharging at least
158 0.5 to 2 gallons of water per hour, but generally less than 60
159 gallons per hour.
160 (6) "Check valve" means a device that permits water to
161 flow in one direction and is installed on any sprinkler where
162 low point drainage occurs or if the sprinkler is located lower
163 than the valve box.
164 (7) "Controller" means a timing mechanism that signals
165 automatic valves to open and close on a pre-set program or based
166 on sensor readings or its mounting box.
167 (8) "Coverage" means the way water is applied to an area.
168 (9) "Department" means the Department of Environmental
169 Protection or its successor agency.
170 (10) "Design pressure" means the pressure at which the
171 irrigation system or its components are designed to operate as
172 measured at the pump discharge or, if there is no pump, at the
173 entrance to the system.
174 (11) "Distribution pattern" means the water depth distance
175 relationship measured from a single emission device.
Page 7 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
176 (12) "Distribution uniformity" means even application of
177 irrigation across a landscaped area, as expressed as a decimal
178 or percent value.
179 (13) "Drip irrigation" means the precise low-rate
180 application of water to the soil surface, beneath the soil
181 surface, or near the plant root zone around widely spaced plants
182 across a large area. Applications normally occur as small
183 streams or discrete continuous drops in the range of 0.5 to 2
184 gallons per hour.
185 (14) "Drip line emitter" means a tube that discharges
186 water from integrated and evenly spaced emitters, perforations,
187 or a porous wall.
188 (15) "Emission device" means a landscape irrigation system
189 component used to dispense irrigation water to the landscape at
190 a specific rate.
191 (16) "Emitter" means a device used to control irrigation
192 discharge from lateral pipes and a device used in micro-
193 irrigation systems.
194 (17) "Establishment" means the process by which newly
195 planted vegetation becomes self-sustaining and rooted in its new
196 location.
197 (18) "Florida Water Star" means a statewide certification
198 program, owned by the St. Johns River Water Management District,
199 for new and existing homes and commercial developments that meet
200 specific water-efficiency criteria for their respective
Page 8 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
201 landscape and irrigation systems, as well as plumbing fixtures
202 and appliances.
203 (19) "Flow rate" means the measure of a volume of water
204 moving in a certain amount of time.
205 (20) "Head" means the exterior case or shell of a
206 sprinkler incorporating a means of connecting to a piping system
207 and designed to provide above-ground or overhead irrigation. The
208 head may also be known as a rotor, a spray head, a mist head, or
209 an impact sprinkler when referring to the type of emission used
210 interchangeably with and in conjunction with a sprinkler.
211 (21) "Head-to-head spacing" means spacing sprinkler heads
212 so the distance between sprinklers is equal to the sprinkler
213 head-rated throw radius.
214 (22) "Hydrozone" means a distinct grouping of plants with
215 similar water and climatic requirements which may be irrigated
216 within a common zone to conserve water, improve efficiency, and
217 avoid overwatering and underwatering.
218 (23) "Irrigation" means the intentional application of
219 water by artificial means to sustain plant growth or optimize
220 production.
221 (24) "Irrigation inspector" means a person responsible for
222 inspecting landscape irrigation systems and carrying out all of
223 the following duties:
224 (a) Making determinations regarding whether a landscape
225 irrigation system complies with all relevant requirements.
Page 9 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
226 (b) Making determinations regarding whether the
227 appropriate backflow prevention device is installed.
228 (c) Providing test results to the water purveyor.
229 (d) Investigating and issuing findings for all complaints
230 alleging deficiency of a landscape irrigation system.
231 (25) "Landscape" means area that is planted with ground
232 covers, shrubs, trees, turf, or similar plant materials.
233 (26) "Landscape area" means the total site area less the
234 building footprint, impervious or paved surfaces, stormwater
235 control structures, or waterbodies. It includes any permeable
236 surface on a given lot or parcel which is covered with gardens,
237 landscape, mulch, or turfgrass.
238 (27) "Landscape irrigation" means the outside watering of
239 plants, such as shrubbery, trees, lawns, grass, ground covers,
240 plants, vines, gardens, and other such flora, which may be
241 situated in diverse locations, such as commercial and industrial
242 establishments, public and residential areas, public medians, or
243 rights-of-way.
244 (28) "Landscape irrigation plan" means a printed or drawn
245 plan for irrigation on a property with scaled dimensions which
246 identifies:
247 (a) Existing rights-of-way, easements, and other land
248 reservations;
249 (b) The water source that will be used for irrigation; and
250 (c) Irrigation specifications that include all of the
Page 10 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
251 following information:
252 1. Pipe location, type, and size.
253 2. Sprinkler head location, including spacing to adjacent
254 sprinkler heads and structures.
255 3. Location of soil moisture sensor probes, if applicable.
256 4. Location and area of irrigation zones.
257 5. Sprinkler head type and application rate.
258 6. Micro-irrigation type and application rate.
259 7. Location of heads requiring check valves and their
260 respective valve sizes.
261 8. All relevant pressure regulations.
262 (29) "Landscape irrigation system" means a system of
263 delivering water to an area where it is needed, but not normally
264 present in necessary volume.
265 (30) "Lateral" means a water delivery pipeline that
266 supplies water from a manifold or header pipe downstream of a
267 control valve to irrigation emission devices.
268 (31) "Low-volume irrigation" means heads that emit less
269 than 0.5 gallons of water per minute.
270 (32) "Micro-bubbler" means a unit designed for micro-
271 irrigation applications requiring higher flow and coverage than
272 a spot emitter or drip, but a lower amount of water than a
273 standard bubbler.
274 (33) "Micro-irrigation" means the application of small
275 quantities of water directly on or below the soil surface or
Page 11 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
276 plant root zone, in discrete drops, thin streams, or miniature
277 sprays, through emitters placed along lateral water delivery
278 pipes. Micro-irrigation encompasses a number of methods or
279 concepts, including drip irrigation, micro-bubblers, micro
280 sprays, subsurface irrigation, or low-volume or trickle
281 irrigation.
282 (34) "Micro-irrigation emission device" means an emission
283 device intended to discharge water in the form of drops or a
284 continuous stream at rates less than 30 gallons of water per
285 hour or 113.5 liters per hour at the largest area of coverage
286 available for the nozzle series when operated at 30 pounds per
287 square inch, except during flushing.
288 (35) "Micro-spray" means a micro-irrigation emission
289 device that uses small-diameter tubing and small orifice micro-
290 spray heads to limit water output and deliver water more
291 directly to the plant root zone by converting irrigation water
292 pressure to discharge water at a flow rate not exceeding 30
293 gallons per hour or 113.5 liters per hour at the largest area of
294 coverage available for the nozzle series when operated at 30
295 pounds per square inch. Micro-spraying includes the use of
296 micro-bubblers, micro-spinners, or micro-spray jets.
297 (36) "Nozzle" means the discharge opening or orifice of an
298 emission device used to control the volume, distribution
299 pattern, or droplet size of water discharge.
300 (37) "Nozzle throw diameter" means the entire measured
Page 12 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
301 width of the throw of a sprinkler head.
302 (38) "Operating pressure" means the water pressure
303 necessary to operate an emission device. Operating pressure may
304 be described as any of the following:
305 (a) "Maximum operating pressure," meaning the highest
306 manufacturer-recommended pressure to ensure proper operation of
307 an emission device.
308 (b) "Minimum operating pressure," meaning the lowest
309 manufacturer-recommended pressure to ensure proper operation of
310 an emission device.
311 (c) "Recommended operating pressure," meaning the
312 manufacturer's recommended pressure for operation of an emission
313 device.
314 (39) "Operator/manager" means a person or an entity
315 responsible for management of an irrigation system.
316 (40) "Orifice" means an opening with a closed perimeter
317 through which water flows.
318 (41) "Person" means any person, firm, partnership,
319 association, corporation, company, or organization.
320 (42) "Radius of throw" means the distance of throw for a
321 circular wetting pattern.
322 (43) "Reclaimed water" means water that has been treated
323 in municipal wastewater facilities, has received at least
324 secondary treatment and basic disinfection, and is safe to use
325 for irrigation and other permitted purposes.
Page 13 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
326 (44) "Residential landscape irrigation" means the
327 irrigation of landscapes associated with any residential housing
328 unit having sanitary facilities and kitchen facilities designed
329 to accommodate one or more residents, including single-family
330 homes, multifamily housing units, and mobile homes.
331 (45) "Riser" means a threaded pipe to which sprinklers or
332 other emitters are attached for above-ground placement.
333 (46) "Rotor sprinkler" means a sprinkler that applies
334 water in a pattern to a defined landscape area by means of one
335 or more rotating streams.
336 (47) "Smart irrigation controller" means a device designed
337 to reduce outdoor water use by irrigating based on a plant's
338 watering needs. There are two basic types:
339 (a) Weather-based irrigation controllers, which use local
340 weather and landscape conditions to tailor watering schedules.
341 (b) Soil moisture-based irrigation controllers, which
342 monitor moisture levels in the soil to prevent irrigation when
343 water is not needed.
344 (48) "Spacing" means the distance between sprinklers or
345 other emitters.
346 (49) "Spray sprinkler" means a sprinkler that steadily
347 applies water in a pattern to a defined landscape area.
348 (50) "Sprinkler" means an emission device consisting of a
349 sprinkler body with one or more nozzles or orifices to convert
350 irrigation water pressure to high-velocity water discharge
Page 14 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
351 through the atmosphere, discharging a minimum of 0.5 gallons per
352 minute or 1.9 liters per minute at the largest area of coverage
353 available for the nozzle series when operated at 30 pounds per
354 square inch or more with a full-circle wetting pattern.
355 (51) "Sprinkler body" means the exterior case or shell of
356 a sprinkler incorporating a means of connection to the piping
357 system, designed to convey water to a nozzle or an orifice. The
358 term includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:
359 (a) "Rotor sprinkler body," meaning a sprinkler body that
360 contains components to drive the rotation of the nozzle or
361 orifice during operation without an integral control valve.
362 (b) "Spray sprinkler body," meaning a sprinkler body that
363 does not contain components to drive the rotation of the nozzle
364 or orifice during operation without an integral control valve.
365 (c) "Valve-in-head sprinkler body," meaning a sprinkler
366 body that contains an integral control valve.
367 (52) "Substantial improvement or modification" means any
368 reconstruction, rehabilitation, addition, or other modification
369 of a structure, the cost of which equals or exceeds 50 percent
370 of the market value of the structure before the start of
371 construction of the modification. The term includes structures
372 that have incurred substantial damage, regardless of the actual
373 repair work performed. The term does not include any of the
374 following:
375 (a) Any project for improvement of a structure to correct
Page 15 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
376 existing violations of state or local health, sanitary, or
377 safety code specifications which have been identified by the
378 local code enforcement official and which improvements are the
379 minimum necessary to assure safe living conditions.
380 (b) Any alteration of a historic structure, provided that
381 the alteration will not preclude the structure's continued
382 designation as an historic structure.
383 (53) "Subsurface irrigation" means a landscape irrigation
384 system equipped with water emitters and a delivery line
385 installed below the soil surface. Such system is designed to
386 distribute water to soils directly from under the surface to
387 prevent airborne drift and minimize runoff.
388 (54) "Supply" means the origin or source of the water used
389 in an landscape irrigation system.
390 (55) "Temporary establishment irrigation" means the short-
391 term use of irrigation for the establishment of new vegetation
392 which must be removed once the plants are established.
393 (56) "Throw" means the measured distance from the nozzle
394 or orifice of a sprinkler head to where the sprinkler deposits
395 water.
396 (57) "Turfgrass" means a groundcover surface of mowed
397 grass.
398 (58) "Valve" means a device used to control the flow of
399 water within a landscape irrigation system.
400 (59) "Weather-based irrigation controller" means a device
Page 16 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
401 that uses climatic information to determine when the landscape
402 irrigation system operates by reducing or cancelling irrigation
403 in response to rainfalls, temperature, and other climatic
404 conditions.
405 (60) "Wetting area" means a wetting pattern created by an
406 emission device or multiple emission devices in a defined area.
407 Section 4. Section 373.1864, Florida Statutes, is created
408 to read:
409 373.1864 Legislative findings; landscape irrigation system
410 permit; plan design.—
411 (1) The Legislature finds that the landscape irrigation
412 system permit application procedures in this section provide an
413 economical, efficient, and safe method of reviewing proposed
414 landscape irrigation system plans and specifications before
415 installation, by:
416 (a) Requiring the evaluation of proposed plans for a
417 landscape irrigation system; and
418 (b) Ensuring that, if approved, the landscape irrigation
419 system is installed, maintained, and operated in a manner
420 consistent with a comprehensive plan pursuant to ss. 163.3177
421 and 163.3178 and the health, safety, and general welfare of
422 residents.
423 (2) A person may not install, maintain, alter, repair,
424 service, or inspect a landscape irrigation system, or consult on
425 these activities, unless the person is a licensed irrigation
Page 17 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
426 contractor or the property owner. A local government or water
427 management district may adopt more stringent requirements for a
428 property owner who installs an irrigation system. Only a
429 licensed irrigation contractor may connect a landscape
430 irrigation system to a water supply.
431 (3) To obtain a landscape irrigation permit, a licensed
432 irrigation contractor must submit an application to the
433 appropriate local government or water management district which
434 contains all of the following information:
435 (a) The licensed irrigation contractor's name, address,
436 phone number, and e-mail address.
437 (b) The landscape irrigation contractor's license.
438 (c) A landscape irrigation plan with design drawings that
439 identify all design elements, development materials, and
440 proposed installation methods. Commercial, industrial,
441 multifamily, and municipal buildings must meet any additional
442 requirements provided in Appendix F of the Plumbing Volume of
443 the Florida Building Code.
444 (d) An application fee paid to the appropriate local
445 government or water management district.
446 (4) The licensed irrigation contractor shall create
447 landscape irrigation plan design drawings that are clearly
448 legible at a reasonable scale, display the entire site to be
449 irrigated, and include all modifications. Such design drawings
450 must show that there will not be any drainage from any emission
Page 18 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
451 device when the irrigation system is turned off.
452 (5)(a) Landscape irrigation plans must provide
453 accommodations for smaller areas of sprinkler irrigation,
454 including irrigated turfgrass areas, irrigated landscape bed
455 areas, and unirrigated areas, to prevent direct spray onto
456 buildings, driveways, roadways, or other impervious hardscapes.
457 (b) Such irrigated areas less than 4 feet wide must be
458 irrigated with micro-irrigation or zone-appropriate spray heads.
459 (6) The licensed irrigation contractor must submit the
460 landscape irrigation system permit application and plan to the
461 appropriate local government or water management district before
462 building construction commences.
463 (7) Before a local government or water management district
464 may issue a landscape irrigation permit, the licensed irrigation
465 contractor must provide the local government or water management
466 district with all of the following:
467 (a) A Letter of Certification of Design for a Landscape
468 Irrigation System developed by the department certifying the
469 design is consistent with the requirements of this section and
470 signed by a landscape irrigation system professional.
471 (b) A Letter of Completion Certifying Compliance with
472 Design for a Landscape Irrigation System developed by the
473 department certifying installation is consistent with the design
474 and signed by a landscape irrigation system professional.
475 (c) Proof of certification by the Florida Water Star
Page 19 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
476 certification program.
477 Section 5. Section 373.1865, Florida Statutes, is created
478 to read:
479 373.1865 Landscape irrigation system requirements.—
480 (1) PURPOSE.—The Legislature finds that the purpose of
481 landscape irrigation system standards is to ensure that
482 irrigation systems are designed for maximum efficiency and
483 uniformity in the irrigation zone and that systems prioritize
484 all of the following:
485 (a) Proper installation.
486 (b) Appropriate watering scheduling and run times
487 consistent with s. 373.1866.
488 (c) Regular maintenance by qualified entities.
489 (d) Irrigation for establishment, post-establishment
490 scheduling, and appropriate removal.
491 (2) LANDSCAPE IRRIGATION SYSTEM REQUIREMENTS.—
492 (a) A landscape irrigation system must be divided into
493 zones based on all of the following factors:
494 1. Available flow rate.
495 2. Cultural use of the area.
496 3. Type of vegetation irrigated, such as native plants,
497 shrubs, or turfgrass.
498 4. Type of sprinklers, including sprinklers with matching
499 precipitation rates.
500 5. Soil characteristics and slope.
Page 20 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
501 6. Sun exposure.
502 (b) Spray heads and rotors may not be mixed in the same
503 zone, and bubblers for trees must be in separate zones.
504 (c) Turfgrass and landscape beds must be irrigated in
505 separate zones.
506 (d) Landscape irrigation systems must be designed to use
507 the lowest quality water that is available, is feasible to use,
508 and has been evaluated as suitable. This includes reclaimed
509 water and stormwater.
510 (3) SPRINKLER SPACING REQUIREMENTS.—Landscape irrigation
511 system sprinkler spacing must be designed and maintained in the
512 following manner:
513 (a) Sprinkler heads must be spaced at 50 percent of the
514 nozzle throw diameter from adjacent sprinkler heads in all
515 directions the nozzle throws. The respective local government
516 may allow a variance for areas where head-to-head spacing will
517 oversaturate the soil or lead to inefficient water use.
518 (b) Sprinklers must be spaced at least 12 inches from
519 buildings and 4 inches from impervious areas.
520 (c) Sprinkler heads for turfgrass areas must be designed
521 and maintained with:
522 1. A minimum 6-inch-high sprinkler body for St. Augustine,
523 Zoysia, or Bahia grasses.
524 2. A minimum 4-inch-high sprinkler body for Centipede,
525 Bermuda, or Seashore Paspalum grasses.
Page 21 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
526 (d) Sprinkler inspections, conducted by an irrigation
527 inspector, must take place at least quarterly to avoid watering
528 of impervious surfaces.
529 (e) Rotors and sprays in turf areas must be spaced to
530 achieve head-to-head coverage.
531 (f) All sprinkler heads must be pressure-regulated at the
532 head or zone valve and set to manufacturer specifications.
533 (g) Landscape irrigation system pipes must maintain a
534 maximum of 5 feet per second water flow velocity for landscape
535 irrigation system integrity.
536 (4) LANDSCAPE IRRIGATION EQUIPMENT, CAPACITY, AND
537 ACCESSORIES.—Landscape irrigation systems must be equipped with
538 all of the following:
539 (a) The capacity to operate in the range of 30 to 40
540 pounds per square inch at each spray head or 40 to 50 pounds per
541 square inch at each rotor.
542 (b) Filter devices to ensure emitters maintain proper cast
543 and coverage.
544 (c) An irrigation controller or smart irrigation
545 controller that includes a weather-based irrigation controller.
546 Such controllers must have nonvolatile memory or battery backup
547 capacity that retains the irrigation schedule, set pursuant to
548 s. 373.1866, during and after power outages.
549 (5) ADDITIONAL REGULATIONS.—
550 (a) High-volume irrigation areas may not exceed 60 percent
Page 22 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
551 of the total area to be irrigated. Low-volume irrigation areas
552 may be used in lieu of any high-volume irrigation area.
553 (b) Irrigation risers may not be installed.
554 (c) There must be a minimum of 4 inches between
555 distribution equipment, including sprinklers, pumps, valves, or
556 other components, and impervious surfaces.
557 (d) Landscape irrigation systems must use micro-irrigation
558 in landscape beds if supplemental irrigation is needed.
559 Section 6. Section 373.1866, Florida Statutes, is created
560 to read:
561 373.1866 Landscape irrigation watering schedule.—
562 (1) SCHEDULE.—
563 (a) When daylight saving time is in effect, landscape
564 irrigation may occur only in accordance with the following
565 irrigation schedule:
566 1. Residential landscape irrigation at odd-numbered
567 addresses or properties with no address may occur only on
568 Wednesday or Saturday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4
569 p.m.
570 2. Residential landscape irrigation at even-numbered
571 addresses may occur only on Thursday or Sunday and may not occur
572 between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m.
573 3. Nonresidential landscape irrigation may occur only on
574 Tuesday or Friday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m.
575 4. No more than 0.75 inches of water may be applied per
Page 23 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
576 irrigation zone on any day that irrigation occurs, and such
577 irrigation may not occur for more than 1 hour per irrigation
578 zone on any day that irrigation occurs.
579 (b) When Eastern Standard Time is in effect, landscape
580 irrigation may occur only in accordance with the following
581 irrigation schedule:
582 1. Residential landscape irrigation at odd-numbered
583 addresses or properties with no address may occur only on
584 Saturday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m.
585 2. Residential landscape irrigation at even-numbered
586 addresses may occur only on Sunday and may not occur between 10
587 a.m. and 4 p.m.
588 3. Nonresidential landscape irrigation may occur only on
589 Tuesday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m.
590 4. No more than 0.75 inches of water may be applied per
591 irrigation zone on any day that irrigation occurs, and such
592 irrigation may not occur for more than 1 hour per irrigation
593 zone on any day that irrigation occurs.
594 (c) When Central Standard Time is in effect, landscape
595 irrigation may occur only in accordance with the following
596 irrigation schedule:
597 1. Residential landscape irrigation at odd-numbered
598 addresses or properties with no address may occur only on
599 Saturday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m.
600 2. Residential landscape irrigation at even-numbered
Page 24 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
601 addresses may occur only on Sunday and may not occur between 10
602 a.m. and 4 p.m.
603 3. Nonresidential landscape irrigation may occur only on
604 Tuesday and may not occur between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m.
605 4. No more than 0.75 inches of water may be applied per
606 irrigation zone on any day that irrigation occurs, and such
607 irrigation may not occur for more than 1 hour per irrigation
608 zone on any day that irrigation occurs.
609 (d) Landscape irrigation watering may be limited to only
610 that which may be necessary to meet the landscape's needs.
611 (e) The owner of a new irrigation system must adopt the
612 watering schedule outlined in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c)
613 within 60 days after such system is installed. The licensed
614 irrigation contractor who installed such irrigation system must
615 provide the property owner or user with all of the following
616 post-construction and maintenance system information:
617 1. The irrigation system plan design drawings.
618 2. Maintenance activities and schedules.
619 3. The system's operational schedule.
620 4. Instructions for adjusting the system.
621 5. Water shut-off method.
622 6. The manufacturer's operational guide for the
623 controller.
624 (2) VARIANCE FROM SPECIFIC DAY OF THE WEEK LIMITATIONS.—
625 (a) A local government may grant a variance from the
Page 25 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
626 specific landscape irrigation watering schedule set forth in
627 subsection (1) for any of the following reasons:
628 1. Strict adherence to the watering schedule would lead to
629 unreasonable or unfair results in particular instances, provided
630 that the applicant demonstrates with particularity that
631 compliance with the schedule will result in a substantial
632 economic, health, or other hardship on the applicant requesting
633 the variance or those served by the applicant; or
634 2. A contiguous property is divided into different zones,
635 such that each zone must be irrigated on different days than
636 other zones of the property.
637 (b) A local government may not grant a variance to allow a
638 single zone to be irrigated more than 2 days per week during
639 daylight saving time or more than 1 day per week during Eastern
640 Standard Time or Central Standard Time.
641 (3) EXCEPTIONS TO THE LANDSCAPE IRRIGATION WATERING
642 SCHEDULE.—Landscape irrigation is subject to the following
643 landscape irrigation watering schedule exceptions:
644 (a) Irrigation using a micro-spray, micro-jet, drip, or
645 bubbler irrigation system is allowed at any time.
646 (b) Irrigation of a new landscape is allowed at any time
647 of day on any day for the initial 30 days after installation and
648 every other day for the next 30 days, for a total of one 60-day
649 period, provided that the irrigation is limited to the minimum
650 amount necessary for such landscape establishment.
Page 26 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
651 (c) Watering-in of chemicals, including insecticides,
652 pesticides, fertilizers, fungicides, and herbicides, when
653 required by law or when recommended by the manufacturer or best
654 management practices, is allowed at any time of day on any day
655 within 24 hours after application. Watering-in of chemicals may
656 not exceed 0.25 inches of water per application, except as
657 otherwise required by law or recommended by the manufacturer or
658 best management practices.
659 (d) Irrigation systems may be operated at any time of day
660 on any day for maintenance and repair purposes, not to exceed 20
661 minutes per hour per zone.
662 (e) Irrigation using a handheld hose equipped with an
663 automatic shut-off nozzle is allowed at any time of day on any
664 day.
665 (f) Discharge of water from a water-to-air air-
666 conditioning unit or other water-dependent cooling system is not
667 restricted by this section.
668 (g) The use of water from a reclaimed water system is
669 allowed at any time. For the purposes of this paragraph, a
670 reclaimed water system includes systems in which the primary
671 source is reclaimed water, which may or may not be supplemented
672 from another source during peak demand periods.
673 (h) The use of recycled water from wet detention treatment
674 ponds for irrigation is allowed at any time, provided the ponds
675 are not augmented from any ground or off-site surface water or
Page 27 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
676 public supply sources.
677 (4) ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS.—
678 (a) A spray sprinkler body that is not specifically
679 excluded from the scope of the United States Environmental
680 Protection Agency's WaterSense Specification for Spray Sprinkler
681 Bodies, Version 1.0 program must include an integral pressure
682 regulator and must meet the water efficiency and performance
683 criteria of the program.
684 (b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a person may not sell, offer
685 for sale, lease, or install for compensation a new spray
686 sprinkler body unless the product includes a mark, label, or tag
687 denoting that the product meets or exceeds water efficiency and
688 performance criteria described in paragraph (a).
689 Section 7. Section 373.1867, Florida Statutes, is created
690 to read:
691 373.1867 Enforcement and penalties.—
692 (1) A licensed irrigation contractor as defined in s.
693 489.105(3)(q) shall report landscape irrigation systems that are
694 not in compliance with this act to the irrigation inspector or
695 such personnel as designated by the respective local government.
696 (2) The department, in coordination with local
697 governments, shall authorize law enforcement personnel or other
698 government staff as the enforcement officials.
699 (a)1. Each violation of s. 373.1865 or s. 373.1866 is
700 subject to the following fines or penalties:
Page 28 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
701 a. A written warning for a first violation.
702 b. A $50 fine for a second violation.
703 c. A fine not to exceed $500 for all subsequent
704 violations.
705 2. Funds generated by penalties imposed pursuant to
706 subparagraph 1. shall be used by the respective local government
707 for the administration and enforcement of this act and to
708 further water conservation activities.
709 (b) Regular maintenance and replacement of worn or broken
710 components which interrupts or inhibits the operation of a
711 landscape irrigation system is not a violation of this act if
712 such repairs are conducted within a reasonable time.
713 (c) Enforcement officials may not provide violators with
714 more than one written warning before assessing a fine.
715 (d) The appropriate local government may take any other
716 appropriate legal action, including, but not limited to,
717 injunctive action, to enforce this section.
718 Section 8. Section 373.1868, Florida Statutes, is created
719 to read:
720 373.1868 Severability; conflicting law, rules, or
721 regulations.—
722 (1) If any provision of this act or its application to any
723 person or circumstance is held to be invalid by a court of
724 competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
725 provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect
Page 29 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
726 without the invalid provision or application, and to this end
727 the provisions of this act are severable.
728 (2) It is unlawful for any governmental entity to adopt or
729 to attempt to enforce any law, rule, or regulation in conflict
730 with the provisions of this act.
731 Section 9. Section 373.1869, Florida Statutes, is created
732 to read:
733 373.1869 Rulemaking.—The department may adopt rules to
734 implement this act.
735 Section 10. Section 373.62, Florida Statutes, is amended
736 to read:
737 373.62 Water conservation; automatic sprinkler systems.—
738 (1) A licensed irrigation contractor Any person who
739 purchases and installs an automatic landscape irrigation system
740 shall must properly install, maintain, and operate technology
741 that inhibits or interrupts operation of the system during
742 periods of sufficient moisture.
743 (2) A licensed irrigation contractor who installs or
744 performs work on an automatic landscape irrigation system shall
745 must test for the correct operation of each inhibiting or
746 interrupting device or switch on that system. If such devices or
747 switches are not installed in the system or are not in proper
748 operating condition, the licensed irrigation contractor must
749 install new ones or repair the existing ones and confirm that
750 each device or switch is in proper operating condition before
Page 30 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
751 completing other work on the system.
752 (3) The department shall create a model ordinance by
753 January 15, 2010, that may be adopted and enforced by local
754 governments. The ordinance must, at a minimum:
755 (a) Require licensed contractors to report automatic
756 landscape irrigation systems that are not in compliance with
757 this section to the appropriate authority.
758 (b) Provide penalties for licensed contractors who do not
759 comply with this section. The minimum penalty must be $50 for a
760 first offense, $100 for a second offense, and $250 for a third
761 or subsequent offense.
762
763 Regular maintenance and replacement of worn or broken technology
764 which interrupts or inhibits the operation of an automatic
765 landscape irrigation system is not a violation of this section
766 if such repairs are conducted within a reasonable time.
767 (4) Local governments may adopt the model ordinance by
768 October 1, 2010. Local governments that impose requirements that
769 are more stringent than the model ordinance are exempt from
770 adopting the ordinance.
771 (5) Funds generated by penalties imposed under the
772 ordinance shall be used by the local government for the
773 administration and enforcement of this section and to further
774 water conservation activities.
775 (6) For purposes of this section, a licensed irrigation
Page 31 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
776 contractor includes an individual who holds a specific
777 irrigation contractor's license issued by a county.
778 (4)(a)(7)(a) The Legislature recognizes that lawn and
779 landscape irrigation systems use a substantial amount of the
780 state's potable water. The Legislature finds that smart
781 irrigation systems that use soil moisture sensors with remote
782 monitoring and adjustment capabilities, if properly installed
783 and monitored, provide more efficient irrigation and save
784 substantially more water than conventional time-controlled
785 irrigation systems. This is because smart irrigation systems
786 apply water to lawns and plants only as necessary to maintain
787 required soil moisture, thus minimizing the overwatering or
788 unnecessary watering that occurs with conventional irrigation
789 systems. However, in order for this technology to optimize the
790 efficient application of water it cannot be subject to day or
791 days-of-the-week watering restrictions. The Legislature,
792 therefore, recognizes that enacting a statewide process to
793 provide an exemption from local water restriction ordinances
794 will accelerate the adoption of this water saving technology.
795 Further, a uniform exemption process will streamline variance
796 procedures and minimize delay in implementing such technology.
797 The longer it takes to approve soil moisture sensor control
798 systems, the more potable water is wasted. A uniform variance
799 process will allow state residents to maintain their property
800 and protect water resources while enjoying their landscapes.
Page 32 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
801 (b) For purposes of this subsection, the term:
802 1. "Monitoring entity" means a local government, community
803 development district created pursuant to chapter 190, a
804 homeowners' association created pursuant to chapter 720, a
805 condominium association created pursuant to chapter 718, a
806 cooperative created pursuant to chapter 719, or a public or
807 private utility.
808 2. "Soil moisture sensor" means a soil-based device that
809 assesses the available plant soil moisture in order to minimize
810 the unnecessary use of water and optimize the effectiveness of
811 an irrigation system.
812 3. "Soil moisture sensor control system" is the collective
813 term for an entire soil moisture sensor system that has remote
814 monitoring and adjustment capability.
815 (c) A variance from day or days-of-the-week watering
816 schedules pursuant to s. 373.1866 restrictions, which includes
817 shall include the maximum soil set point for different soil
818 types within the monitoring entity's jurisdiction, must shall be
819 granted by the applicable water management district for any
820 residential, commercial, or recreational user within a
821 monitoring entity's jurisdiction having a soil moisture sensor
822 control system if the monitoring entity certifies that:
823 1. Each soil moisture sensor control system installed
824 within its jurisdiction will have multiple soil sensors that
825 conform to different soil types and slopes in order to optimize
Page 33 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
826 water use for each user, adjust irrigation schedules based on
827 soil moisture requirements, and be installed by a licensed
828 contractor in a manner that is consistent with the Field Guide
829 to Soil Moisture Sensor Use in Florida by the University of
830 Florida IFAS Extension Program for Resource Efficient
831 Communities.
832 2. It has the ability to monitor the status of each
833 individual user's system and to remotely modify the system
834 settings for irrigation cycles and run times.
835 3. It will electronically post and update a list of active
836 users of soil moisture sensor control systems within its
837 jurisdiction on a monthly basis and provide Internet access to
838 such listing and the monitoring database to the water management
839 district and the local government.
840 4. It shall provide notice to a user of noncompliant
841 activity within 48 hours after such activity and, if the user
842 does not take corrective action within 48 hours after such
843 notice, it will remove the posted notice required in
844 subparagraph 5. and remove the user from the active users list
845 required by subparagraph 3.
846 5. It shall post a notice at each parcel that has
847 installed a compliant soil moisture sensor control system in
848 plain view from the nearest roadway stating: "Irrigating with
849 Smart Irrigation Controller," with the address of the parcel,
850 and shall remove the notice if the user is no longer being
Page 34 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
851 monitored by the monitoring entity.
852 (d) Upon installation of a soil moisture sensor control
853 system, the licensed contractor shall certify to the monitoring
854 entity that subparagraphs (c)1. and (c)2. have been met.
855 1. The monitoring entity shall post the notice required by
856 subparagraph (c)5. on the user's property and update the
857 Internet listing of users of active soil moisture sensor control
858 systems to include the new user.
859 2. On an annual basis a professional engineer licensed
860 under chapter 471 or a professional landscape architect licensed
861 under chapter 481 shall perform an annual maintenance review of
862 all soil moisture sensor control systems within the monitoring
863 entity's jurisdiction and certify to the monitoring entity which
864 systems are properly operating and in compliance with paragraph
865 (c). The monitoring entity shall update its Internet listing of
866 users of active soil moisture sensor control systems based on
867 the certification.
868 (e) Failure by the monitoring entity to ensure continual
869 compliance with the condition of this variance shall be cause
870 for the appropriate water management district to revoke the
871 variance upon proper notice to the monitoring entity.
872 (f) The variance provided in this subsection applies to
873 day or days-of-the-week schedules pursuant to s. 373.1866
874 watering restrictions of the water management district as
875 preempted by s. 373.217. All other applicable local government
Page 35 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
876 and water management district restrictions related to
877 irrigation, including, but not limited to, a prohibition on
878 irrigation and time-of-day watering requirements and water
879 shortage or emergency orders issued pursuant to s. 373.246(2)
880 and (7), remain applicable to the soil moisture sensor control
881 system users within a monitoring entity's jurisdiction.
882 (g) This subsection does not require a property owner to
883 install a soil moisture sensor control system. This subsection
884 also does not prohibit a property owner from installing soil
885 moisture sensors and seeking an individual variance from the
886 applicable water management district even if such property is
887 located within the jurisdiction of a monitoring entity that has
888 been granted a variance pursuant to paragraph (c).
889 Section 11. Subsection (3) of section 489.105, Florida
890 Statutes, is amended to read:
891 489.105 Definitions.—As used in this part:
892 (3) "Contractor" means the person who is qualified for,
893 and is only responsible for, the project contracted for and
894 means, except as exempted in this part, the person who, for
895 compensation, undertakes to, submits a bid to, or does himself
896 or herself or by others construct, repair, alter, remodel, add
897 to, demolish, subtract from, or improve any building or
898 structure, including related improvements to real estate, for
899 others or for resale to others; and whose job scope is
900 substantially similar to the job scope described in one of the
Page 36 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
901 paragraphs of this subsection. For the purposes of regulation
902 under this part, the term "demolish" applies only to demolition
903 of steel tanks more than 50 feet in height; towers more than 50
904 feet in height; other structures more than 50 feet in height;
905 and all buildings or residences. Contractors are subdivided into
906 two divisions, Division I, consisting of those contractors
907 defined in paragraphs (a)-(c), and Division II, consisting of
908 those contractors defined in paragraphs (d)-(r) (d)-(q):
909 (a) "General contractor" means a contractor whose services
910 are unlimited as to the type of work which he or she may do, who
911 may contract for any activity requiring licensure under this
912 part, and who may perform any work requiring licensure under
913 this part, except as otherwise expressly provided in s. 489.113.
914 (b) "Building contractor" means a contractor whose
915 services are limited to construction of commercial buildings and
916 single-dwelling or multiple-dwelling residential buildings,
917 which do not exceed three stories in height, and accessory use
918 structures in connection therewith or a contractor whose
919 services are limited to remodeling, repair, or improvement of
920 any size building if the services do not affect the structural
921 members of the building.
922 (c) "Residential contractor" means a contractor whose
923 services are limited to construction, remodeling, repair, or
924 improvement of one-family, two-family, or three-family
925 residences not exceeding two habitable stories above no more
Page 37 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
926 than one uninhabitable story and accessory use structures in
927 connection therewith.
928 (d) "Sheet metal contractor" means a contractor whose
929 services are unlimited in the sheet metal trade and who has the
930 experience, knowledge, and skill necessary for the manufacture,
931 fabrication, assembling, handling, erection, installation,
932 dismantling, conditioning, adjustment, insulation, alteration,
933 repair, servicing, or design, if not prohibited by law, of
934 ferrous or nonferrous metal work of U.S. No. 10 gauge or its
935 equivalent or lighter gauge and of other materials, including,
936 but not limited to, fiberglass, used in lieu thereof and of air-
937 handling systems, including the setting of air-handling
938 equipment and reinforcement of same, the balancing of air-
939 handling systems, and any duct cleaning and equipment sanitizing
940 that requires at least a partial disassembling of the system.
941 (e) "Roofing contractor" means a contractor whose services
942 are unlimited in the roofing trade and who has the experience,
943 knowledge, and skill to install, maintain, repair, alter,
944 extend, or design, if not prohibited by law, and use materials
945 and items used in the installation, maintenance, extension, and
946 alteration of all kinds of roofing, waterproofing, and coating,
947 except when coating is not represented to protect, repair,
948 waterproof, stop leaks, or extend the life of the roof. The
949 scope of work of a roofing contractor also includes all of the
950 following and any related work: skylights; required roof-deck
Page 38 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
951 attachments; any repair or replacement of wood roof sheathing or
952 fascia as needed during roof repair or replacement; and the
953 evaluation and enhancement of roof-to-wall connections for
954 structures with wood roof decking as described in Section 706 of
955 the Florida Building Code-Existing Building, provided that any
956 enhancement, which was properly installed and inspected in
957 accordance with the Office of Insurance Regulation uniform
958 mitigation verification inspection form, the Florida Building
959 Code, or project specific engineering that exceeds these
960 requirements, is done in conjunction with a roof covering
961 replacement or repair.
962 (f) "Class A air-conditioning contractor" means a
963 contractor whose services are unlimited in the execution of
964 contracts requiring the experience, knowledge, and skill to
965 install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or design,
966 if not prohibited by law, central air-conditioning,
967 refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, including duct
968 work in connection with a complete system if such duct work is
969 performed by the contractor as necessary to complete an air-
970 distribution system, boiler and unfired pressure vessel systems,
971 and all appurtenances, apparatus, or equipment used in
972 connection therewith, and any duct cleaning and equipment
973 sanitizing that requires at least a partial disassembling of the
974 system; to install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend,
975 or design, if not prohibited by law, piping, insulation of
Page 39 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
976 pipes, vessels and ducts, pressure and process piping, and
977 pneumatic control piping; to replace, disconnect, or reconnect
978 power wiring on the line or load side of the dedicated existing
979 electrical disconnect switch on single phase electrical systems;
980 to repair or replace power wiring, disconnects, breakers, or
981 fuses for dedicated HVAC circuits with proper use of a circuit
982 breaker lock; to install, disconnect, and reconnect low voltage
983 heating, ventilating, and air-conditioning control wiring; and
984 to install a condensate drain from an air-conditioning unit to
985 an existing safe waste or other approved disposal other than a
986 direct connection to a sanitary system. The scope of work for
987 such contractor also includes any excavation work incidental
988 thereto, but does not include any work such as liquefied
989 petroleum or natural gas fuel lines within buildings, except for
990 disconnecting or reconnecting changeouts of liquefied petroleum
991 or natural gas appliances within buildings; potable water lines
992 or connections thereto; sanitary sewer lines; swimming pool
993 piping and filters; or electrical power wiring. A Class A air-
994 conditioning contractor may test and evaluate central air-
995 conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems,
996 including duct work; however, a mandatory licensing requirement
997 is not established for the performance of these specific
998 services.
999 (g) "Class B air-conditioning contractor" means a
1000 contractor whose services are limited to 25 tons of cooling and
Page 40 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1001 500,000 Btu of heating in any one system in the execution of
1002 contracts requiring the experience, knowledge, and skill to
1003 install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or design,
1004 if not prohibited by law, central air-conditioning,
1005 refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, including duct
1006 work in connection with a complete system only to the extent
1007 such duct work is performed by the contractor as necessary to
1008 complete an air-distribution system being installed under this
1009 classification, and any duct cleaning and equipment sanitizing
1010 that requires at least a partial disassembling of the system; to
1011 install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or design,
1012 if not prohibited by law, piping and insulation of pipes,
1013 vessels, and ducts; to replace, disconnect, or reconnect power
1014 wiring on the line or load side of the dedicated existing
1015 electrical disconnect switch on single phase electrical systems;
1016 to repair or replace power wiring, disconnects, breakers, or
1017 fuses for dedicated HVAC circuits with proper use of a circuit
1018 breaker lock; to install, disconnect, and reconnect low voltage
1019 heating, ventilating, and air-conditioning control wiring; and
1020 to install a condensate drain from an air-conditioning unit to
1021 an existing safe waste or other approved disposal other than a
1022 direct connection to a sanitary system. The scope of work for
1023 such contractor also includes any excavation work incidental
1024 thereto, but does not include any work such as liquefied
1025 petroleum or natural gas fuel lines within buildings, except for
Page 41 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1026 disconnecting or reconnecting changeouts of liquefied petroleum
1027 or natural gas appliances within buildings; potable water lines
1028 or connections thereto; sanitary sewer lines; swimming pool
1029 piping and filters; or electrical power wiring. A Class B air-
1030 conditioning contractor may test and evaluate central air-
1031 conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems,
1032 including duct work; however, a mandatory licensing requirement
1033 is not established for the performance of these specific
1034 services.
1035 (h) "Class C air-conditioning contractor" means a
1036 contractor whose business is limited to the servicing of air-
1037 conditioning, heating, or refrigeration systems, including any
1038 duct cleaning and equipment sanitizing that requires at least a
1039 partial disassembling of the system, and whose certification or
1040 registration, issued pursuant to this part, was valid on October
1041 1, 1988. Only a person who was registered or certified as a
1042 Class C air-conditioning contractor as of October 1, 1988, shall
1043 be so registered or certified after October 1, 1988. However,
1044 the board shall continue to license and regulate those Class C
1045 air-conditioning contractors who held Class C licenses before
1046 October 1, 1988.
1047 (i) "Mechanical contractor" means a contractor whose
1048 services are unlimited in the execution of contracts requiring
1049 the experience, knowledge, and skill to install, maintain,
1050 repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or design, if not prohibited
Page 42 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1051 by law, central air-conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and
1052 ventilating systems, including duct work in connection with a
1053 complete system if such duct work is performed by the contractor
1054 as necessary to complete an air-distribution system, boiler and
1055 unfired pressure vessel systems, lift station equipment and
1056 piping, and all appurtenances, apparatus, or equipment used in
1057 connection therewith, and any duct cleaning and equipment
1058 sanitizing that requires at least a partial disassembling of the
1059 system; to install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend,
1060 or design, if not prohibited by law, piping, insulation of
1061 pipes, vessels and ducts, pressure and process piping, pneumatic
1062 control piping, gasoline tanks and pump installations and piping
1063 for same, standpipes, air piping, vacuum line piping, oxygen
1064 lines, nitrous oxide piping, ink and chemical lines, fuel
1065 transmission lines, liquefied petroleum gas lines within
1066 buildings, and natural gas fuel lines within buildings; to
1067 replace, disconnect, or reconnect power wiring on the line or
1068 load side of the dedicated existing electrical disconnect switch
1069 on single phase electrical systems; to repair or replace power
1070 wiring, disconnects, breakers, or fuses for dedicated HVAC
1071 circuits with proper use of a circuit breaker lock; to install,
1072 disconnect, and reconnect low voltage heating, ventilating, and
1073 air-conditioning control wiring; and to install a condensate
1074 drain from an air-conditioning unit to an existing safe waste or
1075 other approved disposal other than a direct connection to a
Page 43 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1076 sanitary system. The scope of work for such contractor also
1077 includes any excavation work incidental thereto, but does not
1078 include any work such as potable water lines or connections
1079 thereto, sanitary sewer lines, swimming pool piping and filters,
1080 or electrical power wiring. A mechanical contractor may test and
1081 evaluate central air-conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and
1082 ventilating systems, including duct work; however, a mandatory
1083 licensing requirement is not established for the performance of
1084 these specific services.
1085 (j) "Commercial pool/spa contractor" means a contractor
1086 whose scope of work involves, but is not limited to, the
1087 construction, repair, and servicing of any swimming pool, or hot
1088 tub or spa, whether public, private, or otherwise, regardless of
1089 use. The scope of work includes the installation, repair, or
1090 replacement of existing equipment, any cleaning or equipment
1091 sanitizing that requires at least a partial disassembling,
1092 excluding filter changes, and the installation of new pool/spa
1093 equipment, interior finishes, the installation of package pool
1094 heaters, the installation of all perimeter piping and filter
1095 piping, and the construction of equipment rooms or housing for
1096 pool/spa equipment, and also includes the scope of work of a
1097 swimming pool/spa servicing contractor. The scope of such work
1098 does not include direct connections to a sanitary sewer system
1099 or to potable water lines. The installation, construction,
1100 modification, or replacement of equipment permanently attached
Page 44 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1101 to and associated with the pool or spa for the purpose of water
1102 treatment or cleaning of the pool or spa requires licensure;
1103 however, the usage of such equipment for the purposes of water
1104 treatment or cleaning does not require licensure unless the
1105 usage involves construction, modification, or replacement of
1106 such equipment. Water treatment that does not require such
1107 equipment does not require a license. In addition, a license is
1108 not required for the cleaning of the pool or spa in a way that
1109 does not affect the structural integrity of the pool or spa or
1110 its associated equipment.
1111 (k) "Residential pool/spa contractor" means a contractor
1112 whose scope of work involves, but is not limited to, the
1113 construction, repair, and servicing of a residential swimming
1114 pool, or hot tub or spa, regardless of use. The scope of work
1115 includes the installation, repair, or replacement of existing
1116 equipment, any cleaning or equipment sanitizing that requires at
1117 least a partial disassembling, excluding filter changes, and the
1118 installation of new pool/spa equipment, interior finishes, the
1119 installation of package pool heaters, the installation of all
1120 perimeter piping and filter piping, and the construction of
1121 equipment rooms or housing for pool/spa equipment, and also
1122 includes the scope of work of a swimming pool/spa servicing
1123 contractor. The scope of such work does not include direct
1124 connections to a sanitary sewer system or to potable water
1125 lines. The installation, construction, modification, or
Page 45 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1126 replacement of equipment permanently attached to and associated
1127 with the pool or spa for the purpose of water treatment or
1128 cleaning of the pool or spa requires licensure; however, the
1129 usage of such equipment for the purposes of water treatment or
1130 cleaning does not require licensure unless the usage involves
1131 construction, modification, or replacement of such equipment.
1132 Water treatment that does not require such equipment does not
1133 require a license. In addition, a license is not required for
1134 the cleaning of the pool or spa in a way that does not affect
1135 the structural integrity of the pool or spa or its associated
1136 equipment.
1137 (l) "Swimming pool/spa servicing contractor" means a
1138 contractor whose scope of work involves, but is not limited to,
1139 the repair and servicing of a swimming pool, or hot tub or spa,
1140 whether public or private, or otherwise, regardless of use. The
1141 scope of work includes the repair or replacement of existing
1142 equipment, any cleaning or equipment sanitizing that requires at
1143 least a partial disassembling, excluding filter changes, and the
1144 installation of new pool/spa equipment, interior refinishing,
1145 the reinstallation or addition of pool heaters, the repair or
1146 replacement of all perimeter piping and filter piping, the
1147 repair of equipment rooms or housing for pool/spa equipment, and
1148 the substantial or complete draining of a swimming pool, or hot
1149 tub or spa, for the purpose of repair or renovation. The scope
1150 of such work does not include direct connections to a sanitary
Page 46 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1151 sewer system or to potable water lines. The installation,
1152 construction, modification, substantial or complete disassembly,
1153 or replacement of equipment permanently attached to and
1154 associated with the pool or spa for the purpose of water
1155 treatment or cleaning of the pool or spa requires licensure;
1156 however, the usage of such equipment for the purposes of water
1157 treatment or cleaning does not require licensure unless the
1158 usage involves construction, modification, substantial or
1159 complete disassembly, or replacement of such equipment. Water
1160 treatment that does not require such equipment does not require
1161 a license. In addition, a license is not required for the
1162 cleaning of the pool or spa in a way that does not affect the
1163 structural integrity of the pool or spa or its associated
1164 equipment.
1165 (m) "Plumbing contractor" means a contractor whose
1166 services are unlimited in the plumbing trade and includes
1167 contracting business consisting of the execution of contracts
1168 requiring the experience, financial means, knowledge, and skill
1169 to install, maintain, repair, alter, extend, or, if not
1170 prohibited by law, design plumbing. A plumbing contractor may
1171 install, maintain, repair, alter, extend, or, if not prohibited
1172 by law, design the following without obtaining an additional
1173 local regulatory license, certificate, or registration: sanitary
1174 drainage or storm drainage facilities, water and sewer plants
1175 and substations, venting systems, public or private water supply
Page 47 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1176 systems, septic tanks, drainage and supply wells, swimming pool
1177 piping, irrigation systems, and solar heating water systems and
1178 all appurtenances, apparatus, or equipment used in connection
1179 therewith, including boilers and pressure process piping and
1180 including the installation of water, natural gas, liquefied
1181 petroleum gas and related venting, and storm and sanitary sewer
1182 lines. The scope of work of the plumbing contractor also
1183 includes the design, if not prohibited by law, and installation,
1184 maintenance, repair, alteration, or extension of air-piping,
1185 vacuum line piping, oxygen line piping, nitrous oxide piping,
1186 and all related medical gas systems; fire line standpipes and
1187 fire sprinklers if authorized by law; ink and chemical lines;
1188 fuel oil and gasoline piping and tank and pump installation,
1189 except bulk storage plants; and pneumatic control piping
1190 systems, all in a manner that complies with all plans,
1191 specifications, codes, laws, and regulations applicable. The
1192 scope of work of the plumbing contractor applies to private
1193 property and public property, including any excavation work
1194 incidental thereto, and includes the work of the specialty
1195 plumbing contractor. Such contractor shall subcontract, with a
1196 qualified contractor in the field concerned, all other work
1197 incidental to the work but which is specified as being the work
1198 of a trade other than that of a plumbing contractor. This
1199 definition does not limit the scope of work of any specialty
1200 contractor certified pursuant to s. 489.113(6) and does not
Page 48 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1201 require certification or registration under this part as a
1202 category I liquefied petroleum gas dealer, or category V LP gas
1203 installer, as defined in s. 527.01, who is licensed under
1204 chapter 527 or an authorized employee of a public natural gas
1205 utility or of a private natural gas utility regulated by the
1206 Public Service Commission when disconnecting and reconnecting
1207 water lines in the servicing or replacement of an existing water
1208 heater. A plumbing contractor may perform drain cleaning and
1209 clearing and install or repair rainwater catchment systems;
1210 however, a mandatory licensing requirement is not established
1211 for the performance of these specific services.
1212 (n) "Underground utility and excavation contractor" means
1213 a contractor whose services are limited to the construction,
1214 installation, and repair, on public or private property, whether
1215 accomplished through open excavations or through other means,
1216 including, but not limited to, directional drilling, auger
1217 boring, jacking and boring, trenchless technologies, wet and dry
1218 taps, grouting, and slip lining, of main sanitary sewer
1219 collection systems, main water distribution systems, storm sewer
1220 collection systems, and the continuation of utility lines from
1221 the main systems to a point of termination up to and including
1222 the meter location for the individual occupancy, sewer
1223 collection systems at property line on residential or single-
1224 occupancy commercial properties, or on multioccupancy properties
1225 at manhole or wye lateral extended to an invert elevation as
Page 49 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1226 engineered to accommodate future building sewers, water
1227 distribution systems, or storm sewer collection systems at storm
1228 sewer structures. However, an underground utility and excavation
1229 contractor may install empty underground conduits in rights-of-
1230 way, easements, platted rights-of-way in new site development,
1231 and sleeves for parking lot crossings no smaller than 2 inches
1232 in diameter if each conduit system installed is designed by a
1233 licensed professional engineer or an authorized employee of a
1234 municipality, county, or public utility and the installation of
1235 such conduit does not include installation of any conductor
1236 wiring or connection to an energized electrical system. An
1237 underground utility and excavation contractor may not install
1238 piping that is an integral part of a fire protection system as
1239 defined in s. 633.102 beginning at the point where the piping is
1240 used exclusively for such system.
1241 (o) "Solar contractor" means a contractor whose services
1242 consist of the installation, alteration, repair, maintenance,
1243 relocation, or replacement of solar panels for potable solar
1244 water heating systems, swimming pool solar heating systems, and
1245 photovoltaic systems and any appurtenances, apparatus, or
1246 equipment used in connection therewith, whether public, private,
1247 or otherwise, regardless of use. A contractor, certified or
1248 registered pursuant to this chapter, is not required to become a
1249 certified or registered solar contractor or to contract with a
1250 solar contractor in order to provide services enumerated in this
Page 50 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1251 paragraph that are within the scope of the services such
1252 contractors may render under this part.
1253 (p) "Pollutant storage systems contractor" means a
1254 contractor whose services are limited to, and who has the
1255 experience, knowledge, and skill to install, maintain, repair,
1256 alter, extend, or design, if not prohibited by law, and use
1257 materials and items used in the installation, maintenance,
1258 extension, and alteration of, pollutant storage tanks. Any
1259 person installing a pollutant storage tank shall perform such
1260 installation in accordance with the standards adopted pursuant
1261 to s. 376.303.
1262 (q) "Irrigation contractor" means a contractor whose
1263 services are unlimited in the landscape irrigation trade and who
1264 possesses the experience, knowledge, and skill necessary to
1265 sell, install, design, consult, maintain, alter, repair, or
1266 service an irrigation system, including the connection of such
1267 system to a private or public water supply. This includes system
1268 connection to water wells in unincorporated areas.
1269 (r)(q) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose
1270 scope of work and responsibility is limited to a particular
1271 phase of construction established in a category adopted by board
1272 rule and whose scope is limited to a subset of the activities
1273 described in one of the paragraphs of this subsection.
1274 Section 12. Subsections (2) and (4) of section 489.107,
1275 Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (1) of that
Page 51 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1276 section is republished, to read:
1277 489.107 Construction Industry Licensing Board.—
1278 (1) To carry out the provisions of this part, there is
1279 created within the department the Construction Industry
1280 Licensing Board. Members shall be appointed by the Governor,
1281 subject to confirmation by the Senate. Members shall be
1282 appointed for 4-year terms. A vacancy on the board shall be
1283 filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner
1284 as the original appointment. No member shall serve more than two
1285 consecutive 4-year terms or more than 11 years on the board.
1286 (2) The board shall consist of 19 18 members, of whom:
1287 (a) Four are primarily engaged in business as general
1288 contractors;
1289 (b) Three are primarily engaged in business as building
1290 contractors or residential contractors, however, at least one
1291 building contractor and one residential contractor shall be
1292 appointed;
1293 (c) One is primarily engaged in business as a roofing
1294 contractor;
1295 (d) One is primarily engaged in business as a sheet metal
1296 contractor;
1297 (e) One is primarily engaged in business as an air-
1298 conditioning contractor;
1299 (f) One is primarily engaged in business as a mechanical
1300 contractor;
Page 52 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1301 (g) One is primarily engaged in business as a pool
1302 contractor;
1303 (h) One is primarily engaged in business as a plumbing
1304 contractor;
1305 (i) One is primarily engaged in business as an underground
1306 utility and excavation contractor;
1307 (j) One is primarily engaged in business as a landscape
1308 irrigation contractor;
1309 (k)(j) Two are consumer members who are not, and have
1310 never been, members or practitioners of a profession regulated
1311 by the board or members of any closely related profession; and
1312 (l)(k) Two are building officials of a municipality or
1313 county.
1314 (4) The board shall be divided into two divisions,
1315 Division I and Division II.
1316 (a) Division I consists is comprised of the general
1317 contractor, building contractor, and residential contractor
1318 members of the board; one of the members appointed pursuant to
1319 paragraph (2)(k) (2)(j); and one of the members appointed
1320 pursuant to paragraph (2)(l)(2)(k). Division I has jurisdiction
1321 over the regulation of general contractors, building
1322 contractors, and residential contractors.
1323 (b) Division II consists is comprised of the roofing
1324 contractor, sheet metal contractor, air-conditioning contractor,
1325 mechanical contractor, pool contractor, plumbing contractor,
Page 53 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1326 licensed irrigation contractor, and underground utility and
1327 excavation contractor members of the board; one of the members
1328 appointed pursuant to paragraph (2)(k) (2)(j); and one of the
1329 members appointed pursuant to paragraph (2)(l) (2)(k). Division
1330 II has jurisdiction over the regulation of contractors defined
1331 in s. 489.105(3)(d)-(q) s. 489.105(3)(d)-(p).
1332 (c) Jurisdiction for the regulation of specialty
1333 contractors defined in s. 489.105(3)(r) s. 489.105(3)(q) shall
1334 lie with the division having jurisdiction over the scope of work
1335 of the specialty contractor as defined by board rule.
1336 Section 13. Subsection (2) of section 489.111, Florida
1337 Statutes, is amended to read:
1338 489.111 Licensure by examination.—
1339 (2) A person shall be eligible for licensure by
1340 examination if the person:
1341 (a) Is 18 years of age;
1342 (b) Is of good moral character; and
1343 (c) Meets eligibility requirements according to one of the
1344 following criteria:
1345 1. Has received a baccalaureate degree from an accredited
1346 4-year college in the appropriate field of engineering,
1347 architecture, or building construction and has 1 year of proven
1348 experience in the category in which the person seeks to qualify.
1349 For the purpose of this part, a minimum of 2,000 person-hours
1350 shall be used in determining full-time equivalency. An applicant
Page 54 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1351 who is exempt from passing an examination under s. 489.113(1) is
1352 eligible for a license under this section.
1353 2. Has a total of at least 4 years of active experience as
1354 a worker who has learned the trade by serving an apprenticeship
1355 as a skilled worker who is able to command the rate of a
1356 mechanic in the particular trade or as a foreman who is in
1357 charge of a group of workers and usually is responsible to a
1358 superintendent or a contractor or his or her equivalent;
1359 provided, however, that at least 1 year of active experience
1360 shall be as a foreman.
1361 3. Has a combination of not less than 1 year of experience
1362 as a foreman and not less than 3 years of credits for any
1363 accredited college-level courses; has a combination of not less
1364 than 1 year of experience as a skilled worker, 1 year of
1365 experience as a foreman, and not less than 2 years of credits
1366 for any accredited college-level courses; or has a combination
1367 of not less than 2 years of experience as a skilled worker, 1
1368 year of experience as a foreman, and not less than 1 year of
1369 credits for any accredited college-level courses. All junior
1370 college or community college-level courses shall be considered
1371 accredited college-level courses.
1372 4.a. An active certified residential contractor is
1373 eligible to receive a certified building contractor license
1374 after passing or having previously passed the building
1375 contractors' examination if he or she possesses a minimum of 3
Page 55 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1376 years of proven experience in the classification in which he or
1377 she is certified.
1378 b. An active certified residential contractor is eligible
1379 to receive a certified general contractor license after passing
1380 or having previously passed the general contractors' examination
1381 if he or she possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience
1382 in the classification in which he or she is certified.
1383 c. An active certified building contractor is eligible to
1384 receive a certified general contractor license after passing or
1385 having previously passed the general contractors' examination if
1386 he or she possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in
1387 the classification in which he or she is certified.
1388 5.a. An active certified air-conditioning Class C
1389 contractor is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning
1390 Class B contractor license after passing or having previously
1391 passed the air-conditioning Class B contractors' examination if
1392 he or she possesses a minimum of 3 years of proven experience in
1393 the classification in which he or she is certified.
1394 b. An active certified air-conditioning Class C contractor
1395 is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning Class A
1396 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the
1397 air-conditioning Class A contractors' examination if he or she
1398 possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in the
1399 classification in which he or she is certified.
1400 c. An active certified air-conditioning Class B contractor
Page 56 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1401 is eligible to receive a certified air-conditioning Class A
1402 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the
1403 air-conditioning Class A contractors' examination if he or she
1404 possesses a minimum of 1 year of proven experience in the
1405 classification in which he or she is certified.
1406 6.a. An active certified swimming pool servicing
1407 contractor is eligible to receive a certified residential
1408 swimming pool contractor license after passing or having
1409 previously passed the residential swimming pool contractors'
1410 examination if he or she possesses a minimum of 3 years of
1411 proven experience in the classification in which he or she is
1412 certified.
1413 b. An active certified swimming pool servicing contractor
1414 is eligible to receive a certified commercial swimming pool
1415 contractor license after passing or having previously passed the
1416 swimming pool commercial contractors' examination if he or she
1417 possesses a minimum of 4 years of proven experience in the
1418 classification in which he or she is certified.
1419 c. An active certified residential swimming pool
1420 contractor is eligible to receive a certified commercial
1421 swimming pool contractor license after passing or having
1422 previously passed the commercial swimming pool contractors'
1423 examination if he or she possesses a minimum of 1 year of proven
1424 experience in the classification in which he or she is
1425 certified.
Page 57 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1426 d. An applicant is eligible to receive a certified
1427 swimming pool/spa servicing contractor license after passing or
1428 having previously passed the swimming pool/spa servicing
1429 contractors' examination if he or she has satisfactorily
1430 completed 60 hours of instruction in courses related to the
1431 scope of work covered by that license and approved by the
1432 Construction Industry Licensing Board by rule and has at least 1
1433 year of proven experience related to the scope of work of such a
1434 contractor.
1435 7. An applicant may submit an application to the
1436 department to take the irrigation contractors' examination after
1437 he or she satisfactorily completes 60 hours of instruction in
1438 courses related to the scope of work covered by that license and
1439 approved by the Construction Industry Licensing Board by rule.
1440 Section 14. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
1441 489.117, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1442 489.117 Registration; specialty contractors.—
1443 (4)(a)1. A person whose job scope does not substantially
1444 correspond to either the job scope of one of the contractor
1445 categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o), or the job scope of
1446 one of the certified specialty contractor categories established
1447 by board rule, is not required to register with the board. A
1448 local government, as defined in s. 163.211, may not require a
1449 person to obtain a license, issued by the local government or
1450 the state, for a job scope which does not substantially
Page 58 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1451 correspond to the job scope of one of the contractor categories
1452 defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) and (r) s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) and
1453 (q) or authorized in s. 489.1455(1), or the job scope of one of
1454 the certified specialty contractor categories established
1455 pursuant to s. 489.113(6). A local government may not require a
1456 state or local license to obtain a permit for such job scopes.
1457 For purposes of this section, job scopes for which a local
1458 government may not require a license include, but are not
1459 limited to, painting; flooring; cabinetry; interior remodeling
1460 when the scope of the project does not include a task for which
1461 a state license is required; driveway or tennis court
1462 installation; handyman services; decorative stone, tile, marble,
1463 granite, or terrazzo installation; plastering; pressure washing;
1464 stuccoing; caulking; and canvas awning and ornamental iron
1465 installation.
1466 2. A county that includes an area designated as an area of
1467 critical state concern under s. 380.05 may offer a license for
1468 any job scope which requires a contractor license under this
1469 part if the county imposed such a licensing requirement before
1470 January 1, 2021.
1471 3. A local government may continue to offer a license for
1472 veneer, including aluminum or vinyl gutters, siding, soffit, or
1473 fascia; rooftop painting, coating, and cleaning above three
1474 stories in height; or fence installation and erection if the
1475 local government imposed such a licensing requirement before
Page 59 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1476 January 1, 2021.
1477 4. A local government may not require a license as a
1478 prerequisite to submit a bid for public works projects if the
1479 work to be performed does not require a license under general
1480 law.
1481 Section 15. Subsection (1) of section 489.118, Florida
1482 Statutes, is amended to read:
1483 489.118 Certification of registered contractors;
1484 grandfathering provisions.—The board shall, upon receipt of a
1485 completed application and appropriate fee, issue a certificate
1486 in the appropriate category to any contractor registered under
1487 this part who makes application to the board and can show that
1488 he or she meets each of the following requirements:
1489 (1) Currently holds a valid registered local license in
1490 one of the contractor categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(q)
1491 s. 489.105(3)(a)-(p).
1492 Section 16. Subsection (2) of section 489.141, Florida
1493 Statutes, is amended to read:
1494 489.141 Conditions for recovery; eligibility.—
1495 (2) A claimant is not qualified to make a claim for
1496 recovery from the recovery fund if:
1497 (a) The claimant is the spouse of the judgment debtor or
1498 licensee or a personal representative of such spouse;
1499 (b) The claimant is a licensee who acted as the contractor
1500 in the transaction that is the subject of the claim;
Page 60 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 611 2026
1501 (c) The claim is based upon a construction contract in
1502 which the licensee was acting with respect to the property owned
1503 or controlled by the licensee;
1504 (d) The claim is based upon a construction contract in
1505 which the contractor did not hold a valid and current license at
1506 the time of the construction contract;
1507 (e) The claimant was associated in a business relationship
1508 with the licensee other than the contract at issue; or
1509 (f) The claimant had entered into a contract with a
1510 licensee to perform a scope of work described in s.
1511 489.105(3)(d)-(r) s. 489.105(3)(d)-(q) before July 1, 2016.
1512 Section 17. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 61 of 61
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb611-00